South Dakota, session 2026, HB1086.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. There is appropriated $2,700,000 from the general fund, to the Department of
Corrections, for the provision of a grant to a nonprofit corporation that delivers programming
to support offenders and correctional staff.
Section 2. To be awarded the grant, the nonprofit corporation must currently offer trauma-
informed programming that includes leadership development and personal and professional
skills training at state correctional facilities; have delivered this programming at a state
correctional facility within six months before the effective date of this Act; and plan to serve
both offenders and correctional staff at the South Dakota State Penitentiary, Mike Durfee
State Prison, and South Dakota Women's Prison as verified by the Department of Corrections.
Section 3. The secretary of the Department of Corrections shall approve vouchers and the
state auditor shall draw warrants to pay expenditures authorized in this Act.
Section 4. Any amounts appropriated in this Act not lawfully expended or obligated by June
30, 2031, shall revert in accordance with the procedures prescribed in chapter 4-8.
Section 5. This Act is effective beginning June 29, 2026.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.